District of Columbia statutes.
31-5238.03

Waivers and disqualifications.

The Commissioner may grant a business a 6-month waiver from any of the eligibility criteria to receive an Initial Investment if the Commissioner finds that the business will meet the eligibility criteria to receive an Initial Investment within 6 months of the date of issuance of the waiver. The waiver shall expire 6 months after it is issued and a business shall not receive an additional waiver pursuant to this section. Upon satisfaction of all eligibility criteria within the 6-month period, the business shall promptly provide the Commissioner with an affidavit stating that the business has satisfied the eligibility criteria to receive an Initial Investment and shall provide any supporting documents requested by the Commissioner.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-87, § 9b
as added May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-181, § 2(e), 57 DCR 3388

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-5235.